Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-402 Secured party not obligated on
contract of debtor or in tort. The existence of a security interest,
agricultural lien, or authority given to a debtor to dispose of or use
collateral, without more, does not subject a secured party to liability in
contract or tort for the debtor's acts or omissions. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next